Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.290

Utility services—Lien for—Emergency declaration.

(1) Except as provided in RCW 35.21.217(4) and in subsection (2) of this section, cities and towns owning their own waterworks, or electric light or power plants shall have a lien against the premises to which water, electric light, or power services were furnished for four months charges therefor due or to become due, but not for any charges more than four months past due.

(2) The lien provided for in subsection (1) of this section may apply to charges more than four months past due, if the city or town has been unable to pursue collection or a lien against the premises to which water, electric light, or power services were furnished due to an emergency declaration by the governor. A lien may be imposed after the expiration of the emergency declaration that prevented collection. The period in which the lien may be imposed is the later of:

(a) Three months from the expiration of the emergency declaration preventing collection or a lien; or

(b) Three months of the ratepayer's failure to abide by the terms of an agreed payment plan, if the payment plan for past due charges would have allowed the ratepayer to repay the past due charges over a period of six months or more.

[ 2021 c 296 s 15; 2010 c 135 s 2; 1965 c 7 s 35.21.290. Prior: 1933 c 135 s 1; 1909 c 161 s 1; RRS s 9471.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2021 c 296: See notes following RCW 82.14.310.